Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.18
Manager, defined.

Manager means a person appointed by a corporation or limited liability company to oversee the daily operation of the business licensed in Nebraska. A manager shall meet all the requirements of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act as though he or she were the applicant, including residency.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 26;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 7.